Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 7. LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITIES

SUBTITLE A. LIFE INSURANCE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1113. MANAGEMENT, CONTROL, AND DISPOSITION OF CERTAIN LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY CONTRACTS

Sec. 1113.001. LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY CONTRACTS OF SPOUSE. A spouse, without the joinder or consent of the other spouse, has management, control, and disposition of any contract of life insurance or annuity issued in the spouse's name or to the extent provided by the contract or any assignment of the contract, regardless of whether the contract was issued before, on, or after January 1, 1968.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1F.001, eff. April 1, 2009.